Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.225.055

Excused absences—Search and rescue activities.

The legislature finds that state-recognized search and rescue activities, as defined in chapter 38.52 RCW and the rules interpreting the chapter, are recognized as activities deserving of excuse from school. Therefore, the legislature strongly encourages that excused absences be granted to students for up to five days each year to participate in search and rescue activities, subject to approval by the student's parent and the principal of the student's school, and provided that the activities do not cause a serious adverse effect upon the student's educational progress.

[ 2002 c 214 s 1.]